Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,113
Flood control improvement corridor; acquisition of rights-of-way; sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 2-32,109 to 2-32,112 shall be deemed a condition precedent to the acquisition of rights-of-way by purchase or by eminent domain.

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 20.